dist/turkspell-v0.6-dd/tr.dic
acımak/≓
adaklamak/≓
adımlamak/≓
afaralamak/≓
ahlamak/≓
akaçlamak/≓
aksamak/≓
akşamlamak/≓
alalamak/≓
alaşımlamak/≓
alkışlamak/≓
altdamak/≓
alçılamak/≓
alıntılamak/≓
ambalajlamak/≓
amonyaklamak/≓
anlamak/≓
ansımak/≓
anımsamak/≓
araklamak/≓
aramak/≓
arkalamak/≓
artdamak/≓
arıklamak/≓
arışlamak/≓
asfaltlamak/≓
atamak/≓
atlamak/≓
avlamak/≓
ayarlamak/≓
aykırılamak/≓
aynalamak/≓
ayrımsamak/≓
ayıklamak/≓
azarlamak/≓
açkılamak/≓
açımlamak/≓
açınsamak/≓
ağlamak/≓
ağnamak/≓
ağılamak/≓
ağırsamak/≓
aşamalamak/≓
aşağısamak/≓
aşılamak/≓
badanalamak/≓
baharlamak/≓
ballamak/≓
balyalamak/≓
bangırdamak/≓
bantlamak/≓
barımak/≓
basamaklamak/≓
basınçlamak/≓
bayatlamak/≓
bağdalamak/≓
bağlamak/≓
bağıtlamak/≓
bağışıklamak/≓
baş komak/≓
başlamak/≓
beyazlamak/≓
bohçalamak/≓
bordalamak/≓
boğasamak/≓
bukağılamak/≓
burgaçlamak/≓
buğrasamak/≓
bıngıldamak/≓
camlamak/≓
cavlamak/≓
cazırdamak/≓
cilalamak/≓
contalamak/≓
cumbalamak/≓
cımbızlamak/≓
cırmaklamak/≓
cırnaklamak/≓
cırıldamak/≓
cıvıldamak/≓
cıyaklamak/≓
cızlamak/≓
cızırdamak/≓
dallamak/≓
damlamak/≓
dangırdamak/≓
darlamak/≓
dayamak/≓
dayantılamak/≓
dağlamak/≓
dikiş tutturamamak/≓
dolaplamak/≓
dosyalamak/≓
duldalamak/≓
duraklamak/≓
duralamak/≓
duyarkatlamak/≓
dızlamak/≓
dışalımlamak/≓
dışlamak/≓
egavlamak/≓
emaylamak/≓
fakslamak/≓
faturalamak/≓
formatlamak/≓
fosfatlamak/≓
fıkramak/≓
fırlamak/≓
fırtına patlamak/≓
fırınlamak/≓
fıslamak/≓
fısıldamak/≓
fışkılamak/≓
fıştaklamak/≓
fışırdamak/≓
gagalamak/≓
gammazlamak/≓
gıcıklamak/≓
gıdaklamak/≓
gıkı çıkmamak/≓
gırtlaklamak/≓
gıygıylamak/≓
hacamatlamak/≓
haklamak/≓
hallaçlamak/≓
hangırdamak/≓
haplamak/≓
harlamak/≓
harıldamak/≓
hasırlamak/≓
hatırlamak/≓
haydalamak/≓
haylamak/≓
haçlamak/≓
haşıllamak/≓
hesaplamak/≓
hoş karşılamak/≓
hırpalamak/≓
hırıldamak/≓
hışılamak/≓
hışırdamak/≓
ihtiyarlamak/≓
imzalamak/≓
ispatlamak/≓
kabaklamak/≓
kadrajlamak/≓
kakımak/≓
kakıçlamak/≓
kalaylamak/≓
kalıplamak/≓
kamçılamak/≓
kancalamak/≓
kanlamak/≓
kanıksamak/≓
kanıtsamak/≓
kapamak/≓
kapsamak/≓
karamak/≓
karbonatlamak/≓
kargımak/≓
karlamak/≓
karımak/≓
karışlamak/≓
karşıtlamak/≓
kasnaklamak/≓
katarlamak/≓
katranlamak/≓
kavgımak/≓
kavramak/≓
kayarlamak/≓
kaypamak/≓
kayşamak/≓
kazımak/≓
kaçamak/≓⊈⊉⊊⊋⊌⊍⊎⊏
kağşamak/≓
kaşlamak/≓
kaşımak/≓
kirizmalamak/≓
kolalamak/≓
kolonyalamak/≓
kopyalamak/≓
korkalamak/≓
kovalamak/≓
kucaklamak/≓
kundaklamak/≓
kuşaklamak/≓
kıkırdamak/≓
kılıflamak/≓
kımıldamak/≓
kınamak/≓
kınlamak/≓
kıpırdamak/≓
kırcımak/≓
kırıklamak/≓
kıskaçlamak/≓
kısıtlamak/≓
kıtıklamak/≓
kıvramak/≓
kıyaslamak/≓
kızaklamak/≓
kışalamak/≓
kışlamak/≓
laklamak/≓
limanlamak/≓
lığlamak/≓
makadamlamak/≓
makyajlamak/≓
malalamak/≓
mandallamak/≓
manyamak/≓
masatlamak/≓
maşalamak/≓
mumyalamak/≓
mıncıklamak/≓
mışıldamak/≓
naşlamak/≓
nişanlamak/≓
odaklamak/≓
oranlamak/≓
orsalamak/≓
oyalamak/≓
paklamak/≓
paraflamak/≓
parpılamak/≓
pataklamak/≓
paylamak/≓
piyazlamak/≓
ponzalamak/≓
programlamak/≓
pırlamak/≓
pıtırdamak/≓
rampalamak/≓
rüzgârlamak/≓
sakırdamak/≓
sallamamak/≓
sangılamak/≓
sargılamak/≓
sarsalamak/≓
savatlamak/≓
sayfalamak/≓
sayıklamak/≓
saçmalamak/≓
sert damak/≓
silalamak/≓
soğanlamak/≓
suçüstü yakalamak/≓
sözü bağlamak/≓
sıklamak/≓
sınıflamak/≓
sırtlamak/≓
sıvamak/≓
sığamak/≓
talanlamak/≓
tangırdamak/≓
tanımak/≓
tapanlamak/≓
taraklamak/≓
tartaklamak/≓
tasımlamak/≓
taşlamak/≓
teraslamak/≓
tokaçlamak/≓
topallamak/≓
tornalamak/≓
turfalamak/≓
tuzaklamak/≓
tıkırdamak/≓
tınlamak/≓
tıpışlamak/≓
tırmıklamak/≓
tırıllamak/≓
uyaklamak/≓
vaklamak/≓
vayvaylamak/≓
vıcıklamak/≓
vırlamak/≓
yabalamak/≓
yadımlamak/≓
yakılamak/≓
yalamak/≓
yalpalamak/≓
yanlamak/≓
yanıtlamak/≓
yaramamak/≓
yarılamak/≓
yaslamak/≓
yavaşlamak/≓
yayıklamak/≓
yağlamak/≓
yaşmaklamak/≓
yuhalamak/≓
yuvalamak/≓
yıldızlamak/≓
zamanlamak/≓
zayıflamak/≓
zımparalamak/≓
zırlamak/≓
çakmaklamak/≓
çalımlamak/≓
çaplamak/≓
çatıldamak/≓
çağlamak/≓
çelikçomak/≓
çıdamak/≓
çıkınlamak/≓
çınlamak/≓
çıtlamak/≓
çıvlamak/≓
ılgamak/≓
ıpıldamak/≓
ırgalamak/≓
ıslamak/≓
ığralamak/≓
ışıldamak/≓
şaklamak/≓
şamandıralamak/≓
şaplamak/≓
şarıldamak/≓
şişmanlamak/≓
şıpırdamak/≓
